Hawaii statutes.
§291C-93 Certain vehicles must stop at all
railroad crossings. (a) The driver of any motor vehicle carrying
passengers for hire, or of any school bus carrying any school child, or of any
vehicle carrying explosive substances or flammable liquids as a cargo or part
of a cargo, before crossing at grade any track or tracks of a railroad, shall
stop such vehicle within fifty feet but not less than fifteen feet from the
nearest rail of such railroad, and while so stopped shall listen and look in
both directions along the track for any approaching train, and for signals
indicating the approach of a train, except as hereinafter provided, and if a
train is approaching, and is approximately within fifteen hundred feet of the
crossing, shall not proceed until after the train has passed. After stopping
as required herein and determining that no train is approaching, the driver of
any such vehicle shall cross only in such gear of the vehicle that there will
be no necessity for changing gears while traversing the crossing and the driver
shall not shift gears while crossing the track or tracks.

(b) No stop need be made at any such crossing
where a police officer or a traffic-control signal directs traffic to proceed.

(c) This section shall not apply at
street-railway grade crossings within a business or residence district. [L
1971, c 150, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1997, c 156, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next